Utah statutes.
59-10-204.   State taxable income of a nonresident estate or trust.
For a taxable year, the state taxable income of a nonresident estate or trust
is an amount calculated by:
(1)  determining the unadjusted income of the nonresident estate or trust for
that taxable year after making the adjustments required by:
(a)  Section 59-10-202;
(b)  Section 59-10-207;
(c)  Section 59-10-209.1; or
(d)  Section 59-10-210; and
(2)  calculating the portion of the amount determined under Subsection (1)
that is derived from Utah sources determined in accordance with the principles
of Section 59-10-117.
